Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2913
Investment program; accounting; audit.

The investment program shall maintain accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and applicable federal requirements, subject to annual independent audit.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 13.
July 18, 2026